Maryland, session 2025, HB1303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9.5–404.
(a) The State Board shall adopt rules and regulations for licensing and operating
child care centers.
(b) These rules and regulations shall:
(13) Subject to subsection [(c)] (D) of this section, establish probationary
employment qualifications for an individual who is applying for the first time to be a child
care teacher in a child care center in the State that serves preschool or school–age children
who are at least 3 years old.
(C) (1) THESE RULES AND REGULATIONS SHALL SET MINIMAL
EXPERIENTIAL REQUIREMENTS FOR INDIVIDUALS TO QUALIFY AS A CHILD CARE
TEACHER THAT REQUIRE A CHILD CARE TEACHER TO:
(1) HOLD A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA;
(2) HOLD A CERTIFICATE OF HIGH SCHOOL EQUIVALENCY;
(3) HAVE SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED COURSES FOR CREDIT AT AN
ACCREDITED INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT ARE APPROVED BY THE
STATE BOARD AS SUFFICIENT TO QUALIFY AS A PROSPECTIVE CHILD CARE
TEACHER;
(4) HAVE SUCCESSFULLY BEEN EMPLOYED FOR 2 YEARS IN A
POSITION OTHER THAN A CHILD CARE TEACHER FOR A REGISTERED FAMILY CHILD
CARE HOME, A REGISTERED LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME, OR A LICENSED
CHILD CARE CENTER; OR
(5) MEET THE PROBATIONARY EMPLOYMENT QUALIFICATIONS
UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION PROVIDE A PATHWAY FOR AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO IS QUALIFIED TO BE A CHILD CARE TEACHER, BUT LACKS PROOF OF
NECESSARY EDUCATIONAL ATTAINMENT, TO ATTEST TO THE QUALIFYING
EDUCATIONAL CREDENTIALS HELD BY THE INDIVIDUAL.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1303 3
[(c)] (D) (1) The probationary employment qualifications established under
subsection (b)(13) of this section shall allow an individual to be employed as a child care
teacher during a probationary period if the individual:
(i) [1.] Is enrolled in approved pre–service training;
[2.] (II) Successfully completes the required 90 hours of the
approved pre–service training within 6 months after being hired; and
[3. Holds an associate degree or a bachelor’s degree in:
A. Early childhood education;
B. Elementary education;
C. Child development;
D. Home economics;
E. Nursing;
F. Social work;
G. Special education; or
H. A related field approved by the Department; or
(ii) 1. Is enrolled in approved pre–service training;
2. Has successfully completed at least 45 hours of the
approved pre–service training at the time the child care center hires the individual;
3. Successfully completes the remaining hours of the
pre–service training within 6 months after being hired; and
4. Holds an associate degree or a bachelor’s degree in a field
other than a field listed under item (i)3 of this paragraph.]
(III) EARNS A CERTIFICATE OF HIGH SCHOOL EQUIVALENCY
WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER BEING HIRED.
(2) [If, at the end of the 6–month probationary period,] A CHILD CARE
CENTER SHALL TERMINATE FOR CAUSE OR REASSIGN TO A DIFFERENT
NONTEACHING POSITION an individual described in paragraph (1) of this subsection [has

HOUSE BILL 1303
not completed the required pre–service training, the child care center shall, with no further
cause, terminate the individual or reassign the individual to a nonteaching position] WHO:
(I) AT THE END OF 6 MONTHS AFTER BEING HIRED, HAS NOT
COMPLETED THE REQUIRED PRE–SERVICE TRAINING; OR
(II) AT THE END OF 2 YEARS AFTER BEING HIRED, HAS NOT
EARNED A CERTIFICATE OF HIGH SCHOOL EQUIVALENCY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.